test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vaj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - вай: # Ordinary nouns 'tongue' - full paradigm including MWN
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: вай
     вай+N+SP+Gen+Indef: ваень
     вай+N+SP+Abl+Indef: вайда
     вай+N+SP+Dat+Indef: ваенди
     вай+N+SP+Abe+Indef: вайфтома
     вай+N+SP+Comp+Indef: вайшка
     вай+N+SP+Ine+Indef: вайса
     вай+N+SP+Ela+Indef: вайста
     вай+N+SP+Ill+Indef: вайс
     вай+N+SP+Prl+Indef: вайгя
     вай+N+SP+Tra+Indef: вайкс
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ваезе
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ваене
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ваезень
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: вайнень
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ваезти, ваезенди]
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: вайненди
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: вайдон
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: вайфтомон
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: вайшкан
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: вайсон
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: вайстон
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: ваезон
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: вайгян
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: вайце
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: вайхне
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: вайцень
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: вайхнень
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: вайдот
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: вайфтомот
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: вайшкат
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: вайсот
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: вайстот
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: ваезот
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: вайгят
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: вайц
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ваенза
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ваенц
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ваензон
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ваенцты
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ваензонды
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: вайдонза
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: вайфтомонза
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: вайшканза
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: вайсонза
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: вайстонза
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: вайзонза
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: вайгянза
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: ваеньке
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: ваеньконь
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: ваеньконди
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: вайдонк
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: вайфтомонк
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: вайшканк
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: вайсонк
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: вайстонк
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: вайзонк
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: вайгянк
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: ваенте
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: ваентень
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: ваентенди
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: вайдонт
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: вайфтомонт
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: вайшкант
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: вайсонт
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: вайстонт
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: ваезонт
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: вайгянт
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: вайсна
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: вайснон
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: вайснонды
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: вайдост
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: вайфтомост
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: вайшкаст
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: вайсост
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: вайстост
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: ваезост
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: вайгяст
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: вайхт
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+Def: вайсь
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+Def: вайть
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [вайти, ваенди]
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+Def: вайхне
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+Def: вайхнень
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+Def: вайхненди
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: ваевок
     вай+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: ваеньвок
     #вай+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/гЕ: ваеньге 
     #сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: сонга 
     вай+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: вайдовок
     вай+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: ваеньдивок
     вай+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: вайфтомовок
     вай+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: вайшкавок
     вай+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: вайсовок
     вай+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: вайстовок
     вай+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: вайска
     вай+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: вайгявок
     вай+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: вайкска
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ваезевок
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ваеневок
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ваезеньге
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ваененьге
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [ваезтивок, ваезендивок]
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ваенендивок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: вайдонга
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: вайфтомонга
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: вайшканка
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: вайсонга
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: вайстонга
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ваезонга
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: вайгянга
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайцевок
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайхневок
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайценьге
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайхненьге
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайдотка
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайфтомотка
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайшкатка
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайсотка
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайстотка
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ваезотка
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: вайгятка
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: вайцевок
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ваензовок
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ваенцка
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ваензонга
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ваенцтывок
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ваензондывок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: вайдонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: вайфтомонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: вайшканзовок
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: вайсонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: вайстонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: вайзонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: вайгянзовок
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ваенькевок
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ваеньконьге
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ваенькондивок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: вайдонковок
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: вайфтомонковок
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: вайшканковок
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: вайсонковок
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: вайстонковок
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: вайзонковок
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: вайгянковок
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ваентевок
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ваентеньге
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ваентендивок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: вайдонтка
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: вайфтомонтовок
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: вайшкантовок
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: вайсонтка
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: вайстонтка
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ваезонтка
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: вайгянтка
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайсновок
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайснонга
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайснондывок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайдостка
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайфтомостка
     вай+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайшкастка
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайсостка
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайстостка
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ваезостка
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: вайгястка
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: вайхтка
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: вайське
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: вайтьке
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: [вайтивок, ваеньдивок]
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: вайхневок
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: вайхненьге
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: вайхнендивок
